Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-212
Peddlers and vendors; regulation.

A city of the primary class shall have the power, by ordinance, to prescribe the kind and description of articles which may be sold and places to be occupied by vendors and may authorize the immediate seizure and arrest or removal from the markets of persons violating regulations fixed by ordinance, together with any articles of produce in their possession, and the immediate seizure and destruction of tainted or unsound meat or other provisions. Nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize the city council by ordinance to assess or impose any tax, assessment, fine, or punishment on any farmer or producer for selling at any time within the city any article of provision or vegetables grown or produced by the farmer or producer.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XVI, p. 131;

R.S.1913, § 4426;

C.S.1922, § 3810;

C.S.1929, § 15-213;

R.S.1943, § 15-212;

Laws 2020, LB1003, § 31.